Hawaii statutes.
§415A-5 General powers. A professional
corporation shall have the powers enumerated in chapter 414, except that a
professional corporation may be a promoter, general partner, member, associate,
or manager only of a partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise
engaged only in rendering professional services or carrying on business
permitted by the corporation's articles of incorporation. [L 1985, c 259, pt of
§1; am L 1987, c 135, §112; am L 2002, c 40, §44]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next